Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-817
Commission;
findings; decisions; orders.

After the hearing
and any investigation, the commission shall make all findings, findings of
fact, recommended decisions and orders, and decisions and orders in writing,
which findings, findings of fact, recommended decisions and orders, and decisions
and orders shall be entered of record. Except as provided in the State Employees
Collective Bargaining Act, the final decision and order or orders shall be
in effect from and after the date therein fixed by the commission, but no
such order or orders shall be retroactive except
as provided otherwise in the Industrial Relations Act. Except as provided otherwise in the Industrial Relations
Act, in the making of any findings or orders in connection with
any such industrial dispute, the commission shall give no consideration to
any evidence or information which it may obtain through an investigation or
otherwise receive, except matters of which the district court might take judicial
notice, unless such evidence or information is presented and made a part of
the record in a hearing and opportunity is given, after reasonable notice
to all parties to the controversy of the initiation of any investigation and
the specific contents of the evidence or information obtained or received,
to rebut such evidence or information either by cross-examination or testimony.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 17, p. 592;

Laws 1979, LB 444, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 832, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 27;

Laws 2011, LB397, § 9.

State Employees Collective Bargaining Act, see section 81-1369.

The provision prohibiting a retroactive order means that the orders of the Court of Industrial Relations cannot apply to a period prior to that embraced within the dispute submitted to it. Crete Education Assn. v. School Dist. of Crete, 193 Neb. 245, 226 N.W.2d 752 (1975).